Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.020

Board of directors, managers, or managing participants.

(1) The board of a state trust company must consist of not fewer than five directors, managers, or managing participants, at least two of whom shall not be officers, managers, employees, or agents of the state trust company, or otherwise in control of the state trust company, either as a principal or in a representative capacity, as "control" is defined in RCW 30B.53.005. Except for a limited liability trust company in which management has been retained by its participants, the principal executive officer of the state trust company is a member of the board. The principal executive officer acting in the capacity of board member is the board's presiding officer unless the board elects a different presiding officer to perform the duties as designated by the board.

(2) Unless the director consents otherwise in writing, a person may not serve as director, manager, or managing participant of a state trust company if:

(a) The state trust company incurs an unreimbursed loss attributable to a charged-off obligation of or holds a judgment against the person or an entity that was controlled by the person at the time of funding and at the time of default on the loan that gave rise to the judgment or charged-off obligation as determined by the definition of "control" set forth in RCW 30B.53.005;

(b) The person has been convicted of a felony or a crime involving personal dishonesty; or

(c) The person has violated a provision of Washington state law, relating to loan of trust funds and purchase or sale of trust property by the trustee, and the violation has not been corrected.

(3) If a state trust company other than a limited liability trust company operated by managing participants does not elect directors or managers before the sixty-first day after the date of its regular annual meeting, the director may appoint a conservator under this title to operate the state trust company and elect directors or managers, as appropriate. If the conservator is unable to locate or elect persons willing and able to serve as directors or managers, the director may close the state trust company for liquidation.

(4) A vacancy on the board that reduces the number of directors, managers, or managing participants to fewer than five must be filled not later than the thirtieth day after the date the vacancy occurs. A limited liability trust company with fewer than five managing participants must add one or more new participants or elect a board of managers of not fewer than five persons to resolve the vacancy. After thirty days after the date the vacancy occurs, the director may appoint a conservator under this title to operate the state trust company and elect a board of not fewer than five persons to resolve the vacancy. If the conservator is unable to locate or elect five persons willing and able to serve as directors or managers, the director may close the state trust company for liquidation.

(5) Before each term to which a person is elected to serve as a director or manager of a state trust company, or annually for a person who is a managing participant, the person shall submit a declaration under penalty of perjury for filing in the minutes of the state trust company stating that the person, to the extent applicable:

(a) Accepts the position and is not disqualified from serving in the position;

(b) Will not violate or knowingly permit an officer, director, manager, managing participant, or employee of the state trust company to violate any law applicable to the conduct of business of the state trust company; and

(c) Will diligently perform the duties of the position.

(6) An advisory director or manager is not considered a director if the advisory director or manager:

(a) Is not elected by the shareholders or participants of the state trust company;

(b) Does not vote on matters before the board or a committee of the board and is not counted for purposes of determining a quorum of the board or committee; and

(c) Provides solely general policy advice to the board.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a state trust company shall have directors, managers, or managing participants, and committees or subcommittees composed of such directors, managers, or managing participants, consistent with the requirements of RCW 30B.24.030 and in conformity with the contents of the state trust company's written statement of principles of trust management, pursuant to RCW 30B.24.040, as adopted by the board and subject to approval of the department.

[ 2019 c 389 s 34; 2014 c 37 s 348.]